West Virginia, session 2026, HB5462.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 30. MINE SUBSIDENCE INSURANCE. §33-30-6. Mine subsidence coverage; waivers. (a) Beginning October 1, 1982, every insurance policy issued or renewed insuring on a direct basis a structure located in this state shall include, at a separately stated premium, insurance for loss occurring on or after October 1, 1982, caused by mine subsidence unless waived by the insured:  A waiver  is not required and  the coverage  may only be provided if requested by the insured in the following counties: Berkeley, Cabell, Calhoun, Hampshire, Hardy, Jackson, Jefferson, Monroe, Morgan, Pendleton, Pleasants, Ritchie, Roane, Wirt, and Wood. (b) The effective date of a new policy or endorsement containing mine subsidence insurance coverage shall be on the thirtieth calendar day after the application date. The premium charged for coverage shall be set by the board: (1) At no time may the deductible be less than $250 nor more than $500; and total insured value reinsured by the board may not exceed $200,000.  In no event may the amount of mine subsidence reinsurance exceed the amount of the fire insurance on the structure.(c) Recovery paid to the policyholder for an incurred covered loss, whether received before or after submission of the loss to the insurer, must first be applied to property damages. If a source other than the mine subsidence fund provides payment to an insured for a loss insured by the mine subsidence insurance program, the fund is only liable up to the statutory limit of reinsurance for the portion of the loss not covered by the other sources. §33-30-12. Right of recourse. (a) Except in the case of fraud by an insurer, the board does not have any right of recourse against the insurer and the insurer may settle losses in the customary manner consistent with this article.(b) The board may require an insurer to attempt recovery from a policyholder for the amounts paid to such policyholder if, in the judgment of the board, the policyholder was not entitled to the amounts paid because of fraud or violation of the policy conditions. The costs of such recovery attempt shall be borne by the board. Any dispute under this section shall be subject to the hearing and appeal provisions of article two of this chapter.(c) The Legislature hereby finds the duties and responsibilities of insurers under this article are to facilitate the availability of mine subsidence coverage in the state through and on behalf of the board; therefore, a policyholder may not bring a cause of action or any other action against the insurer for claims which have been reported to the board arising out of or relating to this article.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home